Washington statutes.
RCW 18.230.020

Use of title—Registration required.

No person may practice or represent oneself as a registered recreational therapist by use of any title without being registered to practice by the department of health, unless otherwise exempted by this chapter.

[ 2002 c 216 s 3.]